Illinois, session 104th, HB3328.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Assisted Living and Shared Housing Act is 5amended by changing Section 150 as follows: 6    (210 ILCS 9/150)7    Sec. 150. Alzheimer and dementia programs. 8    (a) In addition to this Section, Alzheimer and dementia 9programs shall comply with all of the other provisions of this 10Act.11    (b) No person shall be admitted or retained if the 12assisted living or shared housing establishment cannot provide 13or secure appropriate care, if the resident requires a level 14of service or type of service for which the establishment is 15not licensed or which the establishment does not provide, or 16if the establishment does not have the staff appropriate in 17numbers and with appropriate skill to provide such services.18    (c) No person shall be accepted for residency or remain in 19residence if the person's mental or physical condition has so 20deteriorated to render residency in such a program to be 21detrimental to the health, welfare or safety of the person or 22of other residents of the establishment. The Department by 23rule shall identify a validated dementia-specific standard   HB3328 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 10552 BAB 20628 b1with inter-rater reliability that will be used to assess 2individual residents. The assessment must be approved by the 3resident's physician and shall occur prior to acceptance for 4residency, annually, and at such time that a change in the 5resident's condition is identified by a family member, staff 6of the establishment, or the resident's physician.7    (d) No person shall be accepted for residency or remain in 8residence if the person is dangerous to self or others and the 9establishment would be unable to eliminate the danger through 10the use of appropriate treatment modalities.11    (e) No person shall be accepted for residency or remain in 12residence if the person meets the criteria provided in 13subsections (b) through (g) of Section 75 of this Act.14    (f) An establishment that offers to provide a special 15program or unit for persons with Alzheimer's disease and 16related disorders shall: 17        (1) disclose to the Department and to a potential or 18    actual resident of the establishment information as 19    specified under the Alzheimer's Disease and Related 20    Dementias Special Care Disclosure Act; 21        (2) ensure that a resident's representative is 22    designated for the resident; 23        (3) develop and implement policies and procedures that 24    ensure the continued safety of all residents in the 25    establishment, including, but not limited to, those who: 26            (A) may wander; and   HB3328 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 10552 BAB 20628 b1            (B) may need supervision and assistance when 2        evacuating the building in an emergency; 3        (4) provide coordination of communications with each 4    resident, resident's representative, relatives and other 5    persons identified in the resident's service plan; 6        (5) provide cognitive stimulation and activities to 7    maximize functioning; 8        (6) provide an appropriate number of staff for its 9    resident population, as established by rule; 10        (7) require the director or administrator and direct 11    care staff to complete sufficient comprehensive and 12    ongoing dementia and cognitive deficit training, the 13    content of which shall be established by rule; and 14        (8) develop emergency procedures and staffing patterns 15    to respond to the needs of residents.16    (g) Individual residents shall be assessed prior to 17admission using assessment tools that are approved or 18recommended by recognized Alzheimer's and dementia care 19experts, ensuring that the tools are validated for accurately 20identifying and evaluating cognitive impairments related to 21Alzheimer's disease and other forms of dementia. These tools 22shall be reviewed and updated as needed to align with current 23best practices and clinical standards in dementia care. 24(Source: P.A. 96-990, eff. 7-2-10.)